Utah statutes.
26-8b-303.   Duties of emergency medical dispatch centers.

An emergency medical dispatch center shall:

(1)  implement a system to receive and manage the information reported to the emergency medical dispatch center under Section 26-8b-301;

(2)  record in the system described in Subsection (1), all information received under Section 26-8b-301 within 14 days after the day on which the information is received;

(3)  inform a person who calls to report a potential incident of sudden cardiac arrest of the location of any nearby AED; and

(4)  provide the information contained in the system described in Subsection (1), upon request, to:

(a)  the bureau; or

(b)  another emergency medical dispatch center.

